Louisiana, session 2026, HB881.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1451(E), 1464(A)(3), and 1892(F)(1) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§1451. Systems for ratemaking
* * *
E. Nothing in this This Section shall not be construed to prohibit the
commissioner from approving a rate filing prior to the expiration of the notification
periods provided for in this Section.
* * *
§1464. Rate filing
* * *
A.
* * *
(3) The commissioner is authorized to may verify statistical data included
in any rate filing made pursuant to this Section either by requiring substantiating
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1335 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 881
written documentation or by inspecting records of insurers or rating organizations
at the home office or any branch office of the insurer or rating organization.
* * *
§1892. Payment and adjustment of claims; policies other than life and health and
accident; good faith duty; breach of good faith duty; vehicle damage claims;
extension of time to respond to claims during emergency or disaster;
penalties; arson-related claims suspension; definitions
* * *
F.(1) In the adjustment or settlement of first-party losses under fire and
extended coverage policies, an insurer is required to shall include general
contractor's overhead and profit in payments for claims for losses when the services
of a general contractor are reasonably foreseeable. This requirement applies to
policies that provide for the adjustment and settlement of losses on a replacement
cost basis and to policies that provide for the adjustment and settlement of losses on
an actual cash value basis.